Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.800

Exemptions—Solicitation for state capitol historic furnishings and preservation and restoration of state legislative building.

(1) When soliciting charitable gifts, grants, or donations solely for the limited purposes of RCW 27.48.040, members of the capitol furnishings preservation committee are exempt from the laws of this chapter.

(2) When soliciting charitable gifts, grants, or donations solely for the limited purposes of RCW 27.48.050 or when assisting a nonprofit foundation established for the purposes of RCW 27.48.050, state officers and state employees are exempt from the laws of this chapter.

[ 2002 c 167 s 3; 1999 c 343 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Effective date—2002 c 167: See notes following RCW 27.48.050.

Findings—Purpose—1999 c 343: See note following RCW 27.48.040.